Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62Q.1842] PROHIBITION ON USE OF STEP THERAPY PROTOCOLS FOR NEUROLOGICAL CONDITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Clinical practice guideline" has the meaning given in section 62Q.184, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (c) "Neurological condition" means a disorder, whether resulting from accident or illness, that causes an impairment in neurological function. new text end new text begin (d) "Step therapy protocol" has the meaning given in section 62Q.184, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition on use of step therapy protocols. new text end new text begin A health plan that covers treatment for neurological conditions must not limit or exclude coverage for a drug that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and included on the health plan's prescription drug formulary by requiring an enrollee with a neurological condition to follow a step therapy protocol if the approved drug's use is consistent with: new text end new text begin (1) a United States Food and Drug Administration-approved indication; and new text end new text begin (2) a clinical practice guideline. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end